Utah statutes.
78B-6-515.   Distribution of award -- Execution -- Annulment of proceedings
on failure to pay.
Payment may be made to the defendants entitled to payment, or the money may be
deposited in court for the defendants and distributed to those entitled to
payment.  If the money is not paid or deposited, the defendants may have
execution as in civil cases; and if the money cannot be made on execution, the
court upon a showing to that effect shall set aside and annul the entire
proceedings, and restore possession of the property to the defendants, if
possession has been taken by the plaintiff.
